Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2386
Public Funds Deposit Security Act, how cited.

Sections 77-2386 to 77-23,108 shall be known and may be cited as the Public Funds Deposit Security Act.

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 932, § 38;

Laws 2019, LB622, § 1.